Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.052

Retirement board abolished—Transfer of powers, duties, and functions.

The Washington judicial retirement board established by this chapter is abolished. All powers, duties, and functions of the board are transferred to the director of retirement systems.

[ 1982 c 163 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 163: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 163 s 24.]

Effective date—1982 c 163: "This act shall take effect June 30, 1982." [ 1982 c 163 s 25.]